Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 6. SALE OR TRANSFER OF GOODS

CHAPTER 202. SALES OF MOTOR VEHICLES WITH STOPLAMP COVERINGS

Sec. 202.001. SALE OF MOTOR VEHICLE WITH CERTAIN STOPLAMP COVERING PROHIBITED. (a) In this section, "motor vehicle" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.201, Transportation Code.

(b) A person in the business of selling motor vehicles may not sell a motor vehicle with a transparent or semitransparent covering:

(1) placed over a stoplamp that is mounted on the rear center line of the vehicle either in or on the rear window or within six inches from the rear window of the vehicle for the purpose of emitting light when the vehicle's brakes are applied; and

(2) on which is impressed or imprinted a name, trade name, logotype, or other message that a person behind the vehicle can read when the stoplamp is illuminated.

(c) A person who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.